en: Ukulele top wood: Acacia; Carbon fiber; Cedar; Koa; Laminate; Mahogany; Mango; Maple; Ovangkol; Pine; Rosewood; Sapele; Spruce; Walnut; Other
pt-PT: Madeira do tampo do ukulele: Acácia; Fibra de carbono; Cedro; Koa; Laminado; Mogno; Mangueira; Ácer; Ovangkol; Pinho; Pau-rosa; Sapele; Abeto; Nogueira; Outro
pt-BR: Ukulele madeira do tampo: Acácia; Fibra de carbono; Cedro; Koa; Laminado; Mogno; Manga; Maple; Ovangkol; Pinho; Jacarandá; Sapele; Abeto; Nogueira; Outro
ro-RO: Lemnul feței ukulelei: Acacia; Fibră de carbon; Cedru; Koa; Laminat; Mahon; Mango; Arțar; Ovangkol; Pin; Lemn de trandafir; Sapele; Molid; Nuc; Altele
es: Tapa de madera para el ukelele: Acacia; Fibra de carbono; Cedro; Koa; Laminado; Caoba; Mango; Arce; Ovangkol; Pino; Palisandro; Sapeli; Abeto; Nogal; Otro
fi: Ukulelen kansi puuta: Akasia; Hiilikuitu; Setri; Koa; Laminaatti; Mahonki; Mango; Vaahtera; Ovangkol; Mänty; Ruusupuu; Sapelli; Kuusi; Pähkinäpuu; Muu
vi: Mặt đàn ukulele bằng gỗ: Acacia; Sợi carbon; Gỗ tuyết tùng; Koa; Gỗ ép; Gỗ gụ; Gỗ xoài; Gỗ phong; Ovangkol; Gỗ thông; Gỗ cẩm lai; Sapele; Gỗ vân sam; Gỗ óc chó; Khác
ko: 우쿨렐레 상판 목재: 아카시아; 탄소 섬유; 시더; 코아; 라미네이트; 마호가니; 망고; 메이플; 오방콜; 파인; 로즈우드; 사펠리; 스프루스; 월넛; 기타
ja: ウクレレトップ材: アカシア; カーボンファイバー; シダー; コア; ラミネート; マホガニー; マンゴー; メイプル; オバンコール; パイン; ローズウッド; サペリ; スプルース; ウォルナット; その他
zh-CN: 尤克里里面板木材: 金合欢木; 碳纤维; 雪松木; 夏威夷相思木; 合板; 桃花心木; 芒果木; 枫木; 古夷苏木; 松木; 玫瑰木; 沙比利木; 云杉木; 胡桃木; 其他
lt-LT: Ukulelės viršutinė medinė dalis: Akacija; Anglies pluoštas; Kedras; Koa; Laminatas; Raudonmedis; Mangas; Klevas; Ovangkolas; Pušis; Palisandras; Sapelė; Eglė; Riešutmedis; Kita
zh-TW: 烏克麗麗面板木材: 相思木; 碳纖維; 雪松; 夏威夷相思木; 合板; 桃花心木; 芒果木; 楓木; 古夷蘇木; 松木; 玫瑰木; 沙比利木; 雲杉; 胡桃木; 其他
nl: Ukulele bovenbladhout: Acacia; Koolstofvezel; Cederhout; Koa; Laminaat; Mahonie; Mango; Esdoorn; Ovangkol; Grenen; Palissander; Sapele; Sparrenhout; Walnoot; Anders
nb: Ukuleletopp av tre: Akasie; Karbonfiber; Seder; Koa; Laminat; Mahogni; Mango; Lønn; Ovangkol; Furu; Palisander; Sapele; Gran; Valnøtt; Annet
it: Legno della tavola armonica dell'ukulele: Acacia; Fibra di carbonio; Cedro; Koa; Laminato; Mogano; Mango; Acero; Ovangkol; Pino; Palissandro; Sapele; Abete; Noce; Altro
sv: Ukulele-topp i trä: Akacia; Kolfiber; Ceder; Koa; Laminat; Mahogny; Mango; Lönn; Ovangkol; Tall; Rosenträ; Sapele; Gran; Valnöt; Övrigt
bg-BG: Дървесина за горната част на укулелето: Акация; Въглеродни влакна; Кедър; Коа; Ламинат; Махагон; Манго; Клен; Ованкол; Бор; Палисандър; Сапеле; Смърч; Орех; Друго
cs: Horní dřevěná deska ukulele: Akácie; Uhlíkové vlákno; Cedr; Koa; Laminát; Mahagon; Mango; Javor; Ovangkol; Borovice; Palisandr; Sapele; Smrk; Ořech; Ostatní
hr-HR: Gornja ploča ukulele od drveta: Akacija; Karbonska vlakna; Cedar; Koa; Laminat; Mahagonij; Mango; Javor; Ovangkol; Bor; Palisandar; Sapele; Smreka; Orah; Ostalo
fr: Bois de la table de l’ukulélé: Acacia; Fibre de carbone; Cèdre; Koa; Stratifié; Acajou; Manguier; Érable; Ovangkol; Pin; Palissandre; Sapelli; Épicéa; Noyer; Autre
th: ไม้หน้าอูคูเลเล่: อะคาเซีย; คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; ซีดาร์; โคอะ; ลามิเนต; มะฮอกกานี; ไม้มะม่วง; เมเปิ้ล; โอแวงคอล; ไม้สน; โรสวูด; ซาปีลี; สปรูซ; วอลนัต; อื่นๆ
pl: Drewno płyty wierzchniej ukulele: Akacja; Włókno węglowe; Cedr; Koa; Laminat; Mahoń; Mango; Klon; Ovangkol; Sosna; Palisander; Sapele; Świerk; Orzech; Inne
da: Træ til ukuleletop: Akacie; Kulfiber; Ceder; Koa; Laminat; Mahogni; Mango; Ahorn; Ovangkol; Fyr; Palisander; Sapele; Gran; Valnød; Andet
sl-SI: Les za zgornjo ploščo ukuleleja: Akacija; Ogljikova vlakna; Cedra; Koa; Laminat; Mahagonij; Mango; Javor; Ovangkol; Bor; Palisander; Sapele; Smreka; Oreh; Drugo
el: Ξύλο καπακιού ουκουλέλε: Ακακία; Ανθρακόνημα; Κέδρος; Κόα; Laminate; Μαόνι; Μάνγκο; Σφενδάμι; Οβανγκόλ; Πεύκο; Παλίσανδρος; Σαπέλι; Έλατο; Καρυδιά; Άλλο
ru: Древесина верхней деки укулеле: Акация; Углеродное волокно; Кедр; Коа; Ламинат; Махагони; Манго; Клён; Овангкол; Сосна; Палисандр; Сапеле; Ель; Орех; Другое
hu: Ukulele fedlapjának anyaga: Akác; Szénszál; Cédrus; Koa; Laminált; Mahagóni; Mangó; Juhar; Ovangkol; Fenyő; Rózsafa; Sapele; Lucfenyő; Dió; Egyéb
de: Holz der Ukulelendecke: Akazie; Carbon; Zeder; Koa; Laminat; Mahagoni; Mango; Ahorn; Ovangkol; Kiefer; Palisander; Sapele; Fichte; Walnuss; Andere
tr: Ukulele üst kapak ağacı: Akasya; Karbon fiber; Sedir; Koa; Laminat; Maun; Mango; Akçaağaç; Ovangkol; Çam; Gül ağacı; Sapelli; Ladin; Ceviz; Diğer
sk-SK: Drevená vrchná doska ukulele: Akácia; Uhlíkové vlákno; Céder; Koa; Laminát; Mahagón; Mango; Javor; Ovangkol; Borovica; Palisander; Sapele; Smrek; Orech; Iné